test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-k36_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    heyggjur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: heyggjur
    heyggjur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: heyggj
    heyggjur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: heyggi
    heyggjur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: heygs
    heyggjur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: heyggjar
    heyggjur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: heyggjar
    heyggjur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: heyggjum
    heyggjur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: heyggja
    heyggjur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: heyggjurin
    heyggjur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: heyggin
    heyggjur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: heygginum
    heyggjur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: heygsins
    heyggjur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: heyggjarnir
    heyggjur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: heyggjarnar
    heyggjur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: heyggjunum
    heyggjur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: heyggjanna
